Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.85.150

Enforceability of debts—Authority to offer degree required.

A note, instrument, or other evidence of indebtedness or contract relating to payment for education for a degree is not enforceable in the courts of this state by a degree-granting institution or holder of the instrument unless the institution was authorized to offer the degree under this chapter at the time the note, instrument, or other evidence of indebtedness or contract was entered into.

[ 1986 c 136 s 15.]